North Carolina, session 2025, SB464.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), is directed, in coordination with a working group of stakeholders established by
DHB, to develop a team-based care coordination Medicaid service that includes, at a minimum,
screening for alcohol use disorder, opioid use disorder, and other mild to moderate substance use
disorders; prescription medications for opioid use disorder and alcohol use disorder; recovery
support; and case management.
SECTION 1.(b) No later that October 1, 2025, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Health Benefits, shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Medicaid and the Fiscal Research Division containing details on the new Medicaid
service developed in accordance with this section. The report shall include all of the following:
(1) The State share of the cost of the service.
(2) The intended start date for the coverage of the service.
(3) The types of PHP capitated contracts that will cover the service and any
related proposed statutory changes to Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General
Statutes.
SECTION 1.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, is directed to develop a Statewide campaign to (i) educate healthcare providers and
community leaders about any changes made to the Medicaid program related to the treatment of
alcohol use disorder, opioid use disorder, and other mild to moderate substance use disorders;
(ii) train interested providers in clinical care for alcohol use disorder, opioid use disorder, and
other mild to moderate substance use disorders; and (iii) encourage substance use disorder
provider participation in the Medicaid program.
SECTION 2. As required by the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2024,
Public Law 118-42, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits,
shall update relevant Medicaid policy and, as necessary, the Medicaid State Plan to suspend,
rather than terminate, Medicaid coverage upon a Medicaid recipient's incarceration. To facilitate
implementation of the updated policy before the required federal deadline and potentially as early
as July 1, 2025, the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services and the North
Carolina Department of Adult Corrections shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to
share data concerning the Medicaid eligibility status of individuals entering confinement at or
*S464-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
released from North Carolina jails. The Department of Adult Corrections is further directed to
update its internal and external policies and manuals to reflect any changes necessary for
implementation of the updated policy in compliance with federal law.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 464-First Edition